Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 5.1-2.7.
Revenue bonds generally.

The Board is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of revenue bonds of the Board for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more airport projects or of any portion or portions thereof. The principal of and the interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided in this chapter for such payment. Any bonds of the Board issued pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof other than the Board, and shall so state on their face. Neither the commissioners of the Board nor any person executing such bonds shall be liable personally thereon by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Board, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Board, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the bonds. The Board shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form or both, as the Board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The Board may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the airport project or projects for which such bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for such bonds, or may be applied to the payment of the cost of any additional airport project or projects.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Board may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau or agency of the Commonwealth, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter.

History.

1980, c. 750; 1982, c. 563.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.8.
Trust agreement securing bonds.

In the discretion of the Board any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Board and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any airport project or any part thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Board in relation to the acquisition of property and the acquisition, construction, establishment, improvement, extension, enlargement, equipment, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the airport project or projects in connection with which such bonds shall have been authorized, the rates and fees to be charged, the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Board. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Board may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the airport project or projects.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.9.
Rents, fees and charges for services or use of facilities; use and disposition of revenues.

The Board is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, fees, and other charges for the use of or for the services and facilities furnished by each airport project and the different parts thereof, and to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the use of any part thereof, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents and rates of charges for such use. Such rates, fees, and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted that revenues of the Board, together with any other available funds, will be sufficient at all times to pay (i) the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating such airport project or projects, and (ii) the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes. Such rates, fees and other charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other commission, board, bureau or agency of the Commonwealth. The revenues derived from the airport project or projects in connection with which the bonds shall have been issued, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, the revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Board shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the Board, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Board. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.10.
Moneys received deemed trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this chapter and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. In the case of revenues or the proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds, the trustee may invest and reinvest such funds in securities that are legal investments under the laws of the Commonwealth for funds held by fiduciaries pending their need for the construction of the projects. In the case of the proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds, the trustee may invest and reinvest such funds in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States of America. Such money and the interest, income and profits, if any, earned on such investment shall be available for the payment of all or any part of the principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, of the bonds being refunded. The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be so invested and applied as to ensure that the principal, interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds being refunded shall be paid in full on their respective maturity, redemption or interest payment dates. After the terms of the trust have been fully satisfied, any balance of such proceeds, interest, income and profits, if any, realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the Board for use by it in any lawful manner.

History.

1980, c. 750; 1982, c. 563.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.11.
Proceedings by bondholder or trustee to enforce rights.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Board or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, fees and other charges.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.12.
Bonds made securities for investment and deposit.

Bonds issued by the Board under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.13.
Revenue refunding bonds; bonds for refunding and for cost of additional projects.

The Board is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the Board for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the Board, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions, or enlargements of the airport project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued. The Board is further authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of its revenue bonds for the combined purpose of (i) refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and (ii) paying all or any part of the cost of any additional airport project or projects or of any portion or portions thereof. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities, and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the Commonwealth in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.14.
Contracts, leases, and other arrangements.

In connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by the Board, the Board may enter into contracts, leases, and other arrangements with any person or persons (i) granting the privilege of using or improving the airport or air navigation facility or any portion or facility thereof or space therein consistent with the purposes of this chapter; (ii) conferring the privileges of supplying goods, commodities, things, services, or facilities at the airport or air navigation facility; and (iii) making available services to be furnished by the Board or its agents at the airport or air navigation facility.In each case the Board may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals, or fee for the privilege or service, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service at each airport and shall be established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the Board; provided that in no case shall the public be deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use of the airport, air navigation facility, or portion of facility thereof.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan, or agreement authorized by § 5.1-2.16, the Board may by contract, lease, or other arrangements, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person, for a term not to exceed thirty years, the privilege of operating, as agent of the Board or otherwise, any airport owned or controlled by the Board; provided that no person shall be granted any authority to operate an airport other than as a public airport or to enter into any contracts, leases, or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport which the Board might not have undertaken under subsection A of this section.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.15.
Resolutions, rules and regulations, etc.

The Board is authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal such reasonable resolutions, rules, regulations, and orders as it shall deem necessary for the management, government, and use of any airport or air navigation facility owned by it or under its control. No rule, regulation, order, or standard prescribed by the Board shall be inconsistent with, or contrary to, any law of this Commonwealth or act of the Congress of the United States or any regulation promulgated or standard established pursuant thereto concerning such airport or the operation of aircraft. The Board shall keep on file at the principal office of the Board for public inspection a copy of all its rules and regulations.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.16.
Grants or loans of public or private funds.

The Board is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and state moneys and other moneys, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish, in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the Board upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law, and all state moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the Board upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the Commonwealth. State moneys allocated pursuant to §

33.2-1526.6

shall not be used for (i) operating costs unless otherwise approved by the Board or (ii) purposes related to supporting the operation of an airline, either directly or indirectly, through grants, credit enhancements, or other related means.

In considering or evaluating the application for or award of any grant of moneys under this section, the Board shall take into account the capacities of all airports within the affected geographic region.

History.

1980, c. 750; 1998, c. 480; 2017, c. 709; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Cross references.

As to disposition of state sales and use tax revenue, see §

58.1-638

.

The 1998 amendment

added the second paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 709 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical and substituted “§

33.2-1526.6

” for “subdivision A 3 of §

58.1-638

” in the first paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Aviation Board may borrow money and issue note for infrastructure projects. —

If infrastructure projects fall within the context of constructing, enlarging, or improving an airport facility, the Aviation Board may enter into, execute, and deliver a loan agreement to borrow money and issue a note, subject to the receipt of appropriations or grants. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. George P. Ramsey III, Chairman, Virginia Aviation Board, 01-032, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 15 (3/23/01).

§ 5.1-2.17.
Exemptions from taxes or assessments; payments to county or city in lieu of taxes.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of airport projects by the Board will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions. The Board shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any airport project or any property acquired or used by the Board under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income therefrom, and any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation within the Commonwealth; provided that the exemption hereby granted shall not be construed to extend to persons conducting on the premises of an airport businesses for which local or state taxes would otherwise be required. When the bonds or other obligations of the Board issued in connection with the acquisition, construction or improvement of an airport or air navigation facility have been paid, or at an earlier date if the Board deems it financially feasible, the Board shall enter into negotiations with the governing body of the political subdivision in which such airport or facility is located and may agree with such governing body on sums to be paid to the county or city in lieu of taxes. In case of disagreement as to the value of the property, an appeal shall lie to the circuit court of the jurisdiction in which the airport or facility is located which court shall determine the value of such property and the ratio of assessed to true values of property in such political subdivision.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.18.
Joint agency or authority; agreements authorized; terms.

The Board may, to the extent permitted by law, enter into agreements with agencies or authorities in this Commonwealth or from adjoining states or with an agency or authority of the United States for joint action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Each such agreement shall specify its duration, the proportionate interest which each participating authority or agency shall have in the property, facilities, and privileges of the joint undertaking; the apportionment of the costs of the undertaking among the participating authorities or agencies; the disposition of all property, facilities, and privileges jointly owned upon termination of such agreement or any renewal thereof; the payment or assumption of any indebtedness arising out of such joint operation which remains unpaid upon the disposal of all assets or upon the termination of the agreement or any renewal thereof; and such other provisions as may be necessary to insure efficient operation of the joint undertaking.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Editor’s note.

As to the creation of the Virginia’s Region 2000 Airport Authority Act, see Acts 2007, c. 812.

§ 5.1-2.19.
Same; governing body; officers and agents; powers generally.

The agreement shall specify the composition of the governing body of the joint agency or authority created under § 5.1-2.18; provided, however, that the membership thereof from this Commonwealth shall be the same as the membership of the Board created by § 5.1-2.1. Each joint authority shall select officers for such terms as are fixed by the agreement and shall have the power to employ such agents and employees as it may require and as are reasonably necessary in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. Subject to the limitations and restrictions hereinafter set forth, such joint authority shall have the powers set forth in § 5.1-2.2:1.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.20.
Same; eminent domain.

Eminent domain proceedings shall not be instituted by any joint authority except by majority vote of each component agency or authority of such joint authority. If so instituted, any property or rights acquired thereunder shall be held by such agencies or authorities jointly, according to the terms of the agreement creating the joint authority.

History.

1980, c. 750.

Cross references.

As to application of this section, see § 5.1-2.24.

§ 5.1-2.21.
Same; disposal of airport or facility.

The joint authority shall not dispose of any airport, airport navigational facility or real property under its jurisdiction except by majority vote of each component agency or authority; provided, however, that this restriction shall not be construed to apply to any disposition of property contemplated or permitted by § 5.1-2.2:1.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.22.
Acquisition of airport previously operated by United States.

Whenever the Board shall acquire ownership and jurisdiction over any airport or airports previously operated by an agency of the United States, the Board is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement with such agency of the United States, as a condition of the acquisition of the airport, for the provision, necessary and appropriate use, maintenance, and operation, of such airport facilities as may be required by the United States or any specified agency or agencies thereof.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.23.
Board as successor to Virginia Airports Authority.

The Board is the successor in interest to that political subdivision formerly known as the Virginia Airports Authority. As such, the Board stands in the place and stead of, and assumes all rights and duties formerly of, such Authority, including but not limited to all leases, contracts, grants-in-aid and all other agreements of whatsoever nature; holds title to all realty and personalty formerly held by such Authority; and may exercise all powers which might at any time past have been exercised by said Authority.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-2.24.
Applicability of certain sections.

The provisions of §§ 5.1-2.5, 5.1-2.7, 5.1-2.8, 5.1-2.9, 5.1-2.10, 5.1-2.11, 5.1-2.12, 5.1-2.13, and 5.1-2.20 of this chapter shall be applicable only to any airport owned by the Virginia Airports Authority or its successor agency on January 1, 1980.

History.

1980, c. 750.

§ 5.1-3.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 272.

Cross references.

As to the Department of Aviation, see §§ 5.1-1.1 through 5.1-1.7.

As to the Virginia Aviation Board, see §§ 5.1-2.1 through 5.1-2.3.

§ 5.1-4.
Aircraft for use of Department; construction, etc., of aviation facilities by Department.

Within the limits of appropriations made for such purposes, the Department is authorized to purchase aircraft for the use of the Department, provided, however, that the Department shall not purchase any new or used executive aircraft unless specifically requested in the Governor’s budget and approved by the General Assembly in the Appropriations Act, and to purchase land for and to construct, maintain and improve airports, landing fields and other aviation facilities within the Commonwealth for the promotion of aviation in the interest of the public; and neither the appropriations nor any part thereof may be transferred or used for any other purpose than is specified in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-4; 1966, c. 576; 1970, c. 717; 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-5.
Registration of aircraft.

Every resident of the Commonwealth owning a civil aircraft, every nonresident owning a civil aircraft based in the Commonwealth for more than 90 days during any calendar year, and every owner of an aerial application aircraft operating within the Commonwealth or of a civil aircraft operated in the Commonwealth as a for-hire intrastate air carrier shall register such aircraft with the Department before such aircraft is operated in the Commonwealth. Any owner of an unmanned aircraft as defined in §

19.2-60.1

shall not be required to register such aircraft.

The Department shall provide for the issuance, expiration, suspension, and revocation of aircraft registration in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Board. For the purposes of the tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 15 (§

58.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 58.1, including any credit granted pursuant to §

58.1-1504

against such tax, such aircraft registration shall be considered the licensure required by such chapter. The Department shall furnish any necessary forms pursuant to the issuance of such registration and may assess a fee for such issuance not in excess of $5 annually. The Department may, in lieu of issuing aircraft registration required by subsection A, issue commercial aircraft registration to air carriers and commercial dealers and issue to noncommercial dealers noncommercial dealer fleet registration, to cover all aircraft owned by such dealers and all aircraft for sale held by dealers on a consignment basis from an aircraft manufacturer. The Department may assess a fee not in excess of $50 annually for any such noncommercial dealer fleet registrations issued and a fee not in excess of $100 annually for any such commercial fleet registrations issued. The fee for a commercial single aircraft registration shall not be in excess of $10 annually.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, no aircraft shall be required to be registered if the aircraft is brought into the Commonwealth solely for major maintenance or major repair. An aircraft owner shall provide proof that the aircraft is based at an airport in another state, shown by evidence of a hangar or tie-down lease for a minimum of 12 months prior to the aircraft being brought into the Commonwealth, and proof of the work being performed in the Commonwealth, shown by presentation of invoices that describe such work.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-5; 1966, c. 576; 1970, c. 717; 1974, c. 431; 1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 721; 2017, c. 793; 2020, c. 1255; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 45, 46, 372.

Cross references.

As to taxes levied on sale and use of aircraft, see §

58.1-1502

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1255, in subsection A, substituted “90 days during any calendar year” for “60 days during any 12-month period” and added subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 45 and 46, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 372, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, substituted “For the” for “Such aircraft registration or registration requirement shall be considered the licensure or licensure requirement for” and added “including any credit granted pursuant to §

58.1-1504

against such tax, such aircraft registration shall be considered the licensure required by such chapter.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1607 (1974).

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 5.1-6.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 45.

§ 5.1-7.
Licensing of airports and landing areas.

Except as provided in § 5.1-7.2, every person, before operating an airport or landing area or adding or extending a runway, shall first secure from the Department a license. The application therefor shall be made on the form prescribed and furnished by the Department and shall be accompanied by a fee not exceeding $100.

Such license shall be issued for a period not to exceed seven years and shall be renewed every seven years. Before issuing such license, the Department shall require the holder of such license to furnish proof of financial responsibility prescribed in Chapter 8.2 (§ 5.1-88.7 et seq.).

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any airport or landing area which is open to the general public for the landing or departure of any aircraft until a license therefor shall be issued by the Department.

Before issuing such license for the establishment of a new airport, the Department shall investigate the location of such airport or landing area with the relation to its proximity to and its runway orientation in relation to any other airport or landing area and shall provide for the safety of civil aircraft alighting thereon or departing therefrom. If the proposed airport or landing area shall be so situated as to endanger aircraft using the same or any other airport or landing area in close proximity, and if proper provisions have not been made in all other respects for the safety of aircraft alighting thereon or departing therefrom, the license shall not be granted. To be licensed, an airport required to be licensed under § 5.1-7.2 must meet this criterion and any applicable requirement provided for in regulation promulgated under this section, but no others.

The Board may, by regulation, adopt any other requirements for licensure that are related to the safety of civil aircraft using such airport or landing area. Any airport having a license issued prior to October 1, 1995, and not meeting one or more minimum standards as defined in Part III (24 VAC 5-20-120 et seq.) of the Virginia Aviation Regulations, shall be exempt from having to comply with those noncomplying standards for as long as the airport remains an active public-use facility unless those noncomplying standards are caused by natural growth. Should such airport cease to be open to the public for one year, and subsequently reopen, it shall be required to comply with all applicable minimum standards for licensure.

In addition to the above safety requirements, before a license is initially issued, the Department shall consider the reviews and comments of appropriate state agencies coordinated by the Department of Environmental Quality, and shall cause a public hearing to be held concerning the economic, social and environmental effects of the location or runway orientation of the airport or landing area if the facility is listed in the Virginia Air Transportation System Plan; however, such coordinated review by the Department of Environmental Quality shall not exceed 90 days after the Department has requested review by the Department of Environmental Quality. The public hearing required by this section shall be conducted by the Department of Environmental Quality in the jurisdiction in which the airport or landing area is located, after publication of notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in such jurisdiction at least 10 days in advance of such hearing.

Any license issued shall describe the number of runways, the length and orientation of each runway and/or, if appropriate, the landing area.

If a runway is to be extended or new runways are to be added, a revised license shall be applied for from the Department. If the airport or landing area is listed in the Virginia Air Transportation System Plan, the Department shall consider the reviews and comments of appropriate state agencies, coordinated by the Department of Environmental Quality, and shall cause a public hearing to be held concerning the economic, social and environmental effects of such changes to the license.

Whenever a public hearing is called for herein, if there has been a public hearing associated with the development of any environmental documents to comply with the receipt of federal funds, the Department and the Department of Environmental Quality may rely on such document or hearing in carrying out their respective duties set out in this section.

If an airport or landing area cannot meet the requirements for licensure that have been adopted by the Virginia Aviation Board, or having met those requirements cannot maintain compliance, the Department may issue conditional licenses to allow time for the airport or landing areas to take steps to meet those requirements or may revoke any license issued, if requirements for licensure are not met or cannot be met.

Any party aggrieved by the granting or refusal to grant any such license shall have a right of appeal to the circuit court of the jurisdiction where the airport or landing area is to be located, which appeal shall be filed in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

All airports or landing areas that hold licenses or permits shall be issued new licenses, without charge, on or before October 1, 1995, describing the number, length and orientation of the runway or runways or, if appropriate, the landing area, which shall be valid for up to seven years. The length of the new license term may be staggered so that all licenses will not become renewable at the same time. If any airport landing area does not meet the current requirements for licensure, a new license may be issued.

History.

Code 1950, § 5-7; 1966, c. 576; 1979, c. 272; 1980, c. 721; 1981, c. 326; 1991, c. 126; 1995, cc. 682, 690; 1996, cc. 148, 303; 2011, c. 75.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 75 deleted “of this title” from the end of the second paragraph; in the first sentence in the fifth paragraph, inserted “(24 VAC 5-20-120 et seq.),” deleted “(VR 165-01-02:1)” following “Virginia Aviation Regulations,” and added “unless those noncomplying standards are caused by natural growth”; made minor stylistic changes in the sixth paragraph; and updated the statutory reference in the next-to-last paragraph.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 5.1-7.1.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 56.

§ 5.1-7.2.
Registration of private landing areas not within five miles of commercial airport.

Any person owning an area for landing any aircraft, which area is not within five miles of a commercial airport and has been constructed by such person for his private use and which is not open to the general public, shall only be required to register, upon forms furnished by the Department, such landing area with the Department and with the Federal Aviation Administration.

History.

1981, c. 326.